Utah statutes.
73-5a-201.   Approval of state engineer necessary to construct, alter, or
abandon dams.
No person may construct, enlarge, repair, alter, remove, or abandon any dam or
reservoir without obtaining written approval from the state engineer.  Routine
maintenance of the structure does not require approval from the state
engineer.
